Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4259.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Department" means the department of state police. (b) "Fund" means the student safety fund created in section 7. (c) "Hotline" means a statewide toll-free telephone number or other means of communication, or a combination of a toll-free telephone number and another means of communication, that transmits voice, text, photographic, and other messages and information to the department through the departmental website described in section 3(2). (d) "School" means a public, private, denominational, or parochial school offering developmental kindergarten, kindergarten, or any grade from 1 through 12, regardless of whether school is in session. School includes all school property. (e) "School employee" means a full-time or part-time employee of a school, school district, or intermediate school district, including a school administrator, a volunteer with a school, school district, or intermediate school district, or any other individual who provides services to a school, school district, or intermediate school district while he or she is on school property. An individual described in this subdivision is considered a school employee regardless of whether school is in session. (f) "School property" means a building, playing field, or property used for school purposes to impart instruction to school students or used for school purposes, functions, and events, regardless of whether school is in session. School property includes a school bus as that term is defined in section 57 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.57. (g) "School student" means an individual who is enrolled as a student in a school regardless of whether school is in session. (h) "Tip" means a report or other information from the public regarding potential self-harm, harm, or criminal acts directed at school students, school employees, or schools in this state made to the department through the hotline or any successor program. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4258 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.